Washington statutes.
RCW 43.280.100

Revenue collection under RCW 9.68A.105, 9A.88.120, or 9A.88.140—Expenditure of revenue—Conditions—Report.

(1) The department of commerce shall prepare and submit an annual report to the legislature on the amount of revenue collected by local jurisdictions under RCW 9.68A.105, 9A.88.120, or 9A.88.140 and the expenditure of that revenue.

(2) Any funds remitted to the department of commerce pursuant to RCW 9.68A.105, 9A.88.120, or 9A.88.140 shall be spent on the fulfillment of the duties described in subsection (1) of this section. Any remaining funds may be spent on the administration of grants for services for victims of the commercial sex trade, consistent with this chapter.

[ 2013 c 121 s 7.]

NOTES:

Intent—Finding—2013 c 121: See note following RCW 43.280.091.